Hawaii statutes.
§532-11 Advancement; valuation of. The
value of any real or personal estate so advanced, shall be deemed to be that,
if any, which was acknowledged by the child by an instrument in writing;
otherwise, the value shall be estimated according to the worth of the property
when given. [CC 1859, §1459; RL 1925, §3312; RL 1935, §4820; RL 1945, §12080;
RL 1955, §318-11; HRS §532-11]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next